Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-201
County judges as magistrates; jurisdiction.

All county judges in this state shall have the same and equal powers of jurisdiction in all matters relating to the enforcement of the criminal laws of the state, except as otherwise expressly provided, and the jurisdiction of all such officers as magistrates, for the discharge of the duties and for the exercise of the powers enjoined and conferred by this code, shall extend to all crimes and offenses punishable by the laws of this state, committed within their respective jurisdictions, and for the prevention of crimes and offenses as in this code provided, throughout their respective counties.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 260, p. 784;

R.S.1913, § 8914;

C.S.1922, § 9935;

C.S.1929, § 29-201;

R.S.1943, § 29-201;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 162.